Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1583
Closure or site closure and stabilization, defined.

Closure or site closure and stabilization shall mean those actions that are taken upon completion of operations which prepare the disposal site for custodial care and which assure that the disposal site will remain stable and will not need ongoing active maintenance.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 6.